Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.11.080

Initiative and referendum—Election to exercise—Restriction or abandonment.

The qualified electors or legislative body of a noncharter code city may provide for the exercise in their city of the powers of initiative and referendum, upon electing so to do in the manner provided for changing the classification of a city or town in RCW 35A.02.020, 35A.02.025, 35A.02.030, and 35A.02.035, as now or hereafter amended.

The exercise of such powers may be restricted or abandoned upon electing so to do in the manner provided for abandoning the plan of government of a noncharter code city in RCW 35A.06.030, 35A.06.040, 35A.06.050, and 35A.06.060, as now or hereafter amended.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 18 s 18; 1973 1st ex.s. c 81 s 1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1979 ex.s. c 18: See note following RCW 35A.01.070.

Imposition or increase of business and occupation tax—Referendum procedure required—Exclusive procedure: RCW 35.21.706.

Initiative and referendum petitions: RCW 35A.29.170.